Massachusetts, session 194th, H3803.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 22 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(k) Upon receipt of notice submitted by a city or town, in a form and manner specified by
the registrar, indicating that an outstanding municipal fine exists against a particular resident of
the commonwealth or an individual licensed to operate a motor vehicle pursuant to this chapter,
the registrar, without opportunity for further hearing, shall prohibit the issuance or renewal of
such license, learner's permit, right to operate a motor vehicle or certificate of motor vehicle
registration for such resident or individual and forward any notice required by paragraph (d) to
such resident or individual. The registrar shall allow for the issuance or renewal of such license,
learner's permit or right to operate a motor vehicle or allow the registration of a motor vehicle
of 2

upon receipt of notice submitted by a city or town, in a form and manner specified by the
registrar, indicating that the outstanding municipal fine no longer exists. The registrar shall
promulgate regulations to implement this section, which shall include the opportunity for a
hearing to challenge the existence of an outstanding municipal fine. Notices between the
municipalities and the registrar pursuant to this subsection may be made in any form authorized
by the registrar, including electronic transmission. For purposes of this subsection, “outstanding
municipal fine” shall mean a legally enforceable fine incurred as a result of violation of a rule,
regulation, order, ordinance or by-law of any city or town that remains unpaid 25 days after the
last day on which payment of such fine was due or, if the recipient filed a timely appeal with the
city or town, 15 days after the recipient exhausted all administrative and legal remedies and
payment is still due and legally enforceable.
of 2